Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB614.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 304.17A-595 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Actual overpayment" means the portion of any amount paid for pharmacy or
pharmacist services that:
1. Is duplicative because the pharmacy or pharmacist has already been paid
for the services; or
2. Was erroneously paid because the services were not rendered in
accordance with the prescriber's order, in which case only the amount
paid for that portion of the prescription that was filled incorrectly or in
excess of the prescriber's order may be deemed an actual overpayment.
The amount denied, refunded, or recouped shall not include the
dispensing fee paid to the pharmacy if the correct medication was
dispensed to the patient;
(b) "Ambulatory pharmacy" means a pharmacy that:
1. Is open to the general public; and
2. Dispenses outpatient prescription drugs;
(c) "National average drug acquisition cost" means the national average drug
acquisition cost, or NADAC, for a prescription drug or other service that is:
1. Determined by a survey of retail pharmacies; and
2. Published by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services;
(d) "National drug code number" means the unique national drug code number
that identifies a specific approved drug, its manufacturer, and its package
presentation;
(e) "Net amount" means the amount paid to the pharmacy or pharmacist by the
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1880
insurer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other administrator less any fees, price
concessions, and all other revenue passing from the pharmacy or pharmacist
to the insurer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other administrator; and
(f) "Wholesale acquisition cost" means the manufacturer's list price for the drug
to wholesalers or direct purchasers in the United States, not including prompt
pay or other discounts, rebates, or reductions in price, for the most recent
month for which the information is available, as reported in wholesale price
guides or other publications of drug pricing data.
(2) To the extent permitted under federal law, every contract between a pharmacy or
pharmacist and an insurer, a pharmacy benefit manager, or any other administrator
of pharmacy benefits for the provision of pharmacy or pharmacist services under a
health plan, either directly or through a pharmacy services administration
organization or group purchasing organization, shall:
(a) Outline the terms and conditions for the provision of pharmacy or pharmacist
services;
(b) Prohibit the insurer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other administrator from:
1. Reducing payment for pharmacy or pharmacist services, directly or
indirectly, under a reconciliation process to an effective rate of
reimbursement. This prohibition shall include, without limitation,
creating, imposing, or establishing direct or indirect remuneration fees,
generic effective rates, dispensing effective rates, brand effective rates,
any other effective rates, in-network fees, performance fees, point-of-
sale fees, retroactive fees, pre-adjudication fees, post-adjudication fees,
and any other mechanism that reduces, or aggregately reduces, payment
for pharmacy or pharmacist services;
2. Retroactively denying, reducing reimbursement for, or seeking any
refunds or recoupments for a claim for pharmacy or pharmacist services,
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1880
in whole or in part, from the pharmacy or pharmacist after returning a
paid claim response as part of the adjudication of the claim, including
claims for the cost of a medication or dispensed product and claims for
pharmacy or pharmacist services that are deemed ineligible for
coverage, unless one (1) or more of the following occurred:
a. The original claim was submitted fraudulently; or
b. The pharmacy or pharmacist received an actual overpayment;
3. Reimbursing the pharmacy or pharmacist for a prescription drug or other
service at a net amount that is lower than the amount the insurer,
pharmacy benefit manager, or other administrator reimburses itself or a
pharmacy affiliate for the same:
a. Prescription drug by national drug code number; or
b. Service;
4. Collecting cost sharing from a pharmacy or pharmacist that was
provided to the pharmacy or pharmacist by an insured for the provision
of pharmacy or pharmacist services under the health plan; and
5. Designating a prescription drug as a specialty drug unless the drug is a
limited distribution drug that:
a. Requires special handling; and
b. Is not commonly carried at retail pharmacies or oncology clinics
or practices; and
(c) Notwithstanding any other law, provide the following minimum
reimbursements to the pharmacy or pharmacist for each prescription drug or
other service provided by the pharmacy or pharmacist:
1. a. Except as provided in subdivision b. of this subparagraph,
reimbursement for the cost of the drug or other service at an
amount that is not less than:
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1880
i. The national average drug acquisition cost for the drug or
service at the time the drug or service is administered,
dispensed, or provided; or
ii. If the national average drug acquisition cost is not available
at the time a drug is administered or dispensed, the wholesale
acquisition cost for the drug at the time the drug is
administered or dispensed.
b. The minimum reimbursement for the cost of a drug or other
service required under this subparagraph shall not apply to a
pharmacy permitted under KRS Chapter 315 with a designated
pharmacy type of "retail chain" on file with the Kentucky Board of
Pharmacy, or a pharmacist practicing at such a pharmacy, until a
determination by the commissioner under subparagraph 2.a. of this
paragraph has taken effect.
c. For purposes of complying with this subparagraph, the insurer,
pharmacy benefit manager, or other administrator shall utilize the
most recently published monthly national average drug acquisition
cost as a point of reference for the ingredient drug product
component of a pharmacy's or pharmacist's reimbursement for
drugs appearing on the national average drug acquisition cost list;
and
2. a. Except as provided in subdivision b. of this subparagraph, for
health plan years beginning on or after January 1, 2027,
reimbursement for a professional dispensing fee that is not less
than the average cost to dispense a prescription drug in an
ambulatory pharmacy located in Kentucky, as determined by the
commissioner in an administrative regulation promulgated in
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1880
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
b. [i. ]The minimum dispensing fee required under subdivision a.
of this subparagraph shall not apply to a mail-order pharmaceutical
distributor, including a mail-order pharmacy.
[ii. For health plan years beginning prior to January 1, 2027, and
for any future health plan years for which a determination by
the commissioner under subdivision a. of this subparagraph
has not taken effect, the minimum dispensing fee for a
pharmacy permitted under KRS Chapter 315 with a
designated pharmacy type of "retail independent" on file
with the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy, or a pharmacist
practicing at such a pharmacy, shall be not less than ten
dollars and sixty-four cents ($10.64).]
c. In acquiring data for, and making, the determination required
under subdivision a. of this subparagraph, the commissioner shall:
i. Promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A that establishes the data elements to be
collected by the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy under KRS
315.038;
ii. Conduct a study of the dispensing data submitted to the
commissioner by the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy in
accordance with KRS 315.038;
iii. Repeat the study every two (2) years to obtain updated
information;
iv. Adjust the determination every two (2) years as appropriate
based upon the results of each study; and
v. Comply with all requirements of KRS 315.038.
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1880
d. In carrying out his or her duties under this subparagraph, the
commissioner shall cooperate and consult with the Kentucky
Board of Pharmacy.
Section 2. This Act applies to contracts entered on or after the effective date of
this Act.
Section 3. Whereas there is a significant and legitimate need to stabilize the cost
of prescription drugs for retail pharmacy patients, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:40 AM Jacketed